Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.020

Actions for collection of compensation—Requirements.

An exchange facilitator may not bring a suit or action for the collection of compensation in connection with duties performed as an exchange facilitator unless the exchange facilitator alleges and proves that he or she was fully in compliance with this chapter at the time of the offering to perform or performing an act or service regulated under this chapter.

[ 2009 c 70 s 3.]